Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4334.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 79g. (1) "Vulnerable roadway user" means any of the
following:
(a) A pedestrian.
(b) An individual using any of the following:
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(i) Roller skates.
(ii) Inline skates.
(iii) A nonmotorized scooter.
(iv) A nonmotorized skateboard.
(v) A wheelchair.
(c) An individual riding an equine or driving or riding an
equine-drawn carriage.
(d) An individual operating or riding a vulnerable
transportation device in compliance with this act.
(e) A United States Postal Service employee or contractor
operating a vehicle on that individual's rural postal route in the
course of delivering mail or parcels.
(2) As used in this section, "equine" means a horse, pony,
donkey, mule, or hinny.
Sec. 79h. "Vulnerable transportation device" means a device
in, on, or by which an individual is or may be transported or drawn
on a highway or street by human power, or by an electrical
propulsion system with a power of not greater than 750 watts or 1
horsepower and a maximum speed on a paved level surface of not more
than 30 miles per hour. Vulnerable transportation device includes,
but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) An electric personal assistive mobility device as that
term is defined in section 13c.
(b) An electric bicycle as that term is defined in section
13e.
(c) An electric skateboard as that term is defined in section
13f.
(d) A bicycle as that term is defined in section 4.
Sec. 303. (1) The secretary of state shall not issue a license
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


under this act to any of the following individuals:
(a) An individual, as an operator, who is less than 18 years
of age, except as otherwise provided in this act.
(b) An individual, as a chauffeur, who is less than 18 years
of age, except as otherwise provided in this act.
(c) An individual whose license is suspended, revoked, denied,
or canceled in any state. If the suspension, revocation, denial, or
cancellation is not from the jurisdiction that issued the last
license to the individual, the secretary of state may issue a
license after the expiration of 5 years from the effective date of
the most recent suspension, revocation, denial, or cancellation.
(d) An individual who in the opinion of the secretary of state
is afflicted with or suffering from a physical or mental disability
or disease that prevents the individual from exercising reasonable
and ordinary control over a motor vehicle while operating the motor
vehicle on the highways.
(e) An individual who is unable to understand highway warning
or direction signs in the English language.
(f) An individual who is unable to pass a knowledge, skill, or
ability test administered by the secretary of state in connection
with issuing an original operator's or chauffeur's license,
original motorcycle indorsement, endorsement, or an original or
renewal of a vehicle group designation or vehicle
indorsement.endorsement.
(g) A nonresident, including, but not limited to, a foreign
exchange student.
(h) An individual who has failed to answer a citation or
notice to appear in court or for any matter pending or fails to
comply with an order or judgment of the court, including, but not
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


limited to, paying all fines, costs, fees, and assessments, in
violation of section 321a, until that individual answers the
citation or notice to appear in court or for any matter pending or
complies with an order or judgment of the court, including, but not
limited to, paying all fines, costs, fees, and assessments, as
provided under section 321a.
(i) An individual not licensed under this act who has been
convicted of, has received a juvenile disposition for, or has been
determined responsible for a crime or civil infraction described in
section 319, 324, or 904. An individual shall must be denied a
license under this subdivision for the length of time corresponding
to the period of the licensing sanction that would have been
imposed under section 319, 324, or 904 if the individual had been
licensed at the time of the violation.
(j) An individual not licensed under this act who is
determined to have violated section 624a or 624b. The individual
shall must be denied a license under this subdivision for a period
of time that corresponds to the period of the licensing sanction
that would have been imposed under those sections had the
individual been licensed at the time of the violation.
(k) An individual whose commercial driver license application
is canceled under section 324(2).
(l) Unless otherwise eligible under section 307(1), an
individual who is not a citizen of the United States.
(2) On receiving the appropriate records of conviction, the
secretary of state shall revoke the operator's or chauffeur's
license of an individual and deny issuance of an operator's or
chauffeur's license to an individual who has any of the following,
whether under a law of this state, a local ordinance that
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


substantially corresponds to a law of this state, a law of another
state that substantially corresponds to a law of this state, or,
beginning October 31, 2010, a law of the United States that
substantially corresponds to a law of this state:
(a) Any combination of 2 convictions within 7 years for
reckless driving in violation of section 626 before October 31,
2010 or, beginning October 31, 2010, 626(2).
(b) Any combination of 2 or more convictions within 7 years
for any of the following:
(i) A felony in which a motor vehicle was used.
(ii) A violation or attempted violation of section 601b(2) or
(3), section 601c(1) or (2), to (6), section 602a(4) or (5),
section 617, section 653a(3) or (4), or section 904(4) or (5).
(iii) Negligent homicide, manslaughter, or murder that results
from the operation of a vehicle or an attempt to commit any of
those crimes.
(iv) A violation or attempted violation of section 479a(4) or
(5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.479a.
(c) Any combination of 2 convictions within 7 years for any of
the following or a combination of 1 conviction for a violation or
attempted violation of section 625(6) and 1 conviction for any of
the following within 7 years:
(i) A violation or attempted violation of section 625, except a
violation of section 625(2), or a violation of any prior enactment
of section 625 in which the defendant operated a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating or alcoholic liquor or a
controlled substance, or a combination of intoxicating or alcoholic
liquor and a controlled substance, or while visibly impaired, or
with an unlawful bodily alcohol content.
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(ii) A violation or attempted violation of section 625m.
(iii) A violation or attempted violation of former section 625b.
(d) One conviction for a violation or attempted violation of
section 315(5), section 601b(3), section 601c(2), 601c(3) to (6),
section 602a(4) or (5), section 617, section 625(4) or (5), section
653a(4), section 904(4) or (5), or, beginning October 31, 2010,
section 626(3) or (4).
(e) One conviction of negligent homicide, manslaughter, or
murder that results from the operation of a vehicle or an attempt
to commit any of those crimes.
(f) One conviction for a violation or attempted violation of
section 479a(4) or (5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL
750.479a.
(g) Any combination of 3 convictions within 10 years for any
of the following or 1 conviction for a violation or attempted
violation of section 625(6) and any combination of 2 convictions
for any of the following within 10 years, if any of the convictions
resulted from an arrest on or after January 1, 1992:
(i) A violation or attempted violation of section 625, except a
violation of section 625(2), or a violation of any prior enactment
of section 625 in which the defendant operated a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating or alcoholic liquor or a
controlled substance, or a combination of intoxicating or alcoholic
liquor and a controlled substance, or while visibly impaired, or
with an unlawful bodily alcohol content.
(ii) A violation or attempted violation of section 625m.
(iii) A violation or attempted violation of former section 625b.
(3) The secretary of state shall revoke a license under
subsection (2) notwithstanding a court order unless the court order
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


complies with section 323.
(4) Except as otherwise provided under section 304, the
secretary of state shall not issue a license under this act to an
individual whose license has been revoked under this act or revoked
and denied under subsection (2) until all of the following occur,
as applicable:
(a) The later of the following:
(i) The expiration of not less than 1 year after the license
was revoked or denied.
(ii) The expiration of not less than 5 years after the date of
a subsequent revocation or denial occurring within 7 years after
the date of any prior revocation or denial.
(b) For a denial under subsection (2)(a), (b), (c), and (g),
the individual rebuts by clear and convincing evidence the
presumption that results from the prima facie evidence that the
individual is a habitual offender. The convictions that resulted in
the revocation and denial constitute prima facie evidence that the
individual is a habitual offender.
(c) The individual meets the requirements of the department.
(5) The secretary of state shall deny issuing a vehicle group
designation to an individual under either of the following
circumstances:
(a) The individual has been disqualified by the United States
Secretary of Transportation from operating a commercial motor
vehicle.
(b) Beginning on and after January 30, 2012, the individual
does not meet the requirements of the federal regulations under 49
CFR parts 383 and 391 by refusing to certify the type of commercial
motor vehicle operation the individual intends to perform and, if
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


required, fails to present to the secretary of state a valid
medical certification.
(6) Multiple convictions or civil infraction determinations
that result from the same incident must be treated as a single
violation for purposes of denial or revocation of a license under
this section.
(7) As used in this section, "felony in which a motor vehicle
was used" means a felony during the commission of which the
individual operated a motor vehicle and while operating the vehicle
presented real or potential harm to individuals or property and 1
or more of the following circumstances existed:
(a) The vehicle was used as an instrument of the felony.
(b) The vehicle was used to transport a victim of the felony.
(c) The vehicle was used to flee the scene of the felony.
(d) The vehicle was necessary for the commission of the
felony.
Sec. 320a. (1) Not more than 5 days after receipt of a
properly prepared abstract from a court of this state or another
state, the secretary of state shall record the date of conviction,
civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition, and
the number of points for each, based on the following formula,
except as otherwise provided in this section and section 629c:
(a) Manslaughter, negligent homicide, or a felony
resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, ORV, or
snowmobile 6 points
(b) A violation of section 601b(2) or (3), 601c(1)
or (2), to (6), or 653a(3) or (4) or, beginning October
31, 2010, a violation of section 601d 6 points
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(c) A violation of section 625(1), (4), (5), (7), or
(8), section 81134 or 82127(1) of the natural resources
and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL
324.81134 and 324.82127, or a law or ordinance
substantially corresponding to section 625(1), (4), (5),
(7), or (8), or section 81134 or 82127(1) of the natural
resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451,
MCL 324.81134 and 324.82127 6 points
(d) Failing to stop and disclose identity at the
scene of an accident when required by law 6 points
(e) Operating a motor vehicle in violation of
section 626 6 points
(f) Fleeing or eluding an officer 6 points
(g) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to
speed in a work zone described in that section by
exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 15 miles per
hour 5 points
(h) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining
to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 15
miles per hour 4 points
(i) A violation of section 625(3) or (6), section
82127(3) of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82127, or a law or
ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625(3)
or (6) or section 82127(3) of the natural resources and
environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82127 4 points
(j) A violation of section 626a or a law or
ordinance substantially corresponding to section 626a 4 points
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(k) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to
speed in a work zone described in that section by
exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 10 but not more
than 15 miles per hour 4 points
(l) Beginning October 31, 2010, a moving violation
resulting in an at-fault collision with another vehicle,
an individual, or any other object 4 points
(m) Careless driving in violation of section 626b or
a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section
626b 3 points
(n) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining
to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 10
miles per hour but not more than 15 miles per hour 3 points
(o) A violation of section 653a(2) 2 points
(p) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining
to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 5
miles per hour but not more than 10 miles per hour 2 points
(q) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining
to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 1
mile per hour but not more than 5 miles per hour 1 point
(r) Disobeying a traffic signal or stop sign, or
improper passing 3 points
(s) A violation of section 624a, 624b, or a law or
ordinance substantially corresponding to section 624a or
624b 2 points
(t) A violation of section 310e(4) or (6) or a law
or ordinance substantially corresponding to section
310e(4) or (6) 2 points
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(u) All other moving violations pertaining to the
operation of motor vehicles reported under this section 2 points
(v) A refusal by an individual less than 21 years of
age to submit to a preliminary breath test required by a
peace officer under section 625a 2 points
(w) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to
speed in a work zone described in that section by
exceeding the lawful maximum by 10 miles per hour or less 3 points
(x) A third or subsequent violation of section 602b 2 points
(y) A second violation of section 602b 1 point
(2) Points must not be entered for a violation of section
310e(14), 311, 602c, 625m, 627c, 658, 682(5), 710d, 717, 719, 719a,
or 723.
(3) Points must not be entered for bond forfeitures.
(4) Points must not be entered for overweight loads or for
defective equipment.
(5) If more than 1 conviction, civil infraction determination,
or probate court disposition results from the same incident, points
must be entered only for the violation that receives the highest
number of points under this section.
(6) If an individual has accumulated 9 points as provided in
this section, the secretary of state may call the individual in for
an interview as to the individual's driving ability and record
after due notice as to time and place of the interview. If the
individual fails to appear as provided in this subsection, the
secretary of state shall add 3 points to the individual's record.
(7) If an individual violates a speed restriction established
by an executive order issued during a state of energy emergency as
provided by 1982 PA 191, MCL 10.81 to 10.89, the secretary of state
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


shall enter points for the violation under subsection (1).
(8) The secretary of state shall enter 6 points on the record
of an individual whose license is suspended or denied under section
625f. However, if a conviction, civil infraction determination, or
probate court disposition results from the same incident,
additional points for that offense must not be entered.
(9) If a Michigan driver commits a violation in another state
that would be a civil infraction if committed in this state, and a
conviction results solely because of the failure of the Michigan
driver to appear in that state to contest the violation, on receipt
of the abstract of conviction by the secretary of state, the
violation must be noted on the Michigan driver's record, but points
must not be assessed against the Michigan driver license.
Sec. 601c. (1) A person An individual who commits a moving
violation that has criminal penalties and as a result causes injury
to a person vulnerable roadway user who is in compliance with this
act or an individual operating an implement of husbandry on a
highway in compliance with this act is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of
not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(2) An individual who commits a moving violation and as a
result causes a serious injury requiring inpatient treatment at a
hospital or post-acute rehabilitation facility to a vulnerable
roadway user who is in compliance with this act or an individual
operating an implement of husbandry on a highway in compliance with
this act is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(3) An individual who commits a moving violation and as a
result causes death to a vulnerable roadway user who is in
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


compliance with this act is guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than
$7,500.00, or both.
(4) (2) A person An individual who commits a moving violation
that has criminal penalties and as a result causes death to a
person an individual operating an implement of husbandry on a
highway in compliance with this act is guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of
not more than $7,500.00, or both.
(5) An individual who commits a moving violation in a grossly
negligent manner causing the death of a blind pedestrian is guilty
of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years,
a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both.
(6) An individual who commits a moving violation in a grossly
negligent manner causing the death of a blind pedestrian's service
animal is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than 5 years, a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both.
(7) An individual who commits a moving violation in a grossly
negligent manner causing injury to a blind pedestrian's service
animal is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for
not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(8) A blind pedestrian who does not carry a cane or use a
service animal or walker has all the privileges conferred on any
other pedestrian under the laws of this state. The failure of a
blind pedestrian to carry a cane or use a service animal or walker
must not be treated as evidence that the blind pedestrian is not in
compliance with this act.
(9) This section does not prohibit an individual from being
charged with, convicted of, or punished for a violation of any
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


other law committed by the individual while violating this section,
except for a violation of section 626(4).
(10) (3) As used in this section: , "moving
(a) "Blind" means an individual has a visual acuity of 20/200
or less in the better eye with correction, or has limitation of the
individual's field of vision such that the widest diameter of the
visual field subtends an angular distance not greater than 20
degrees.
(b) "Cane" means an aid used by a blind pedestrian for travel
and identification purposes that is predominantly white or metallic
in color with or without a red tip.
(c) "Hospital" means that term as defined in section 20106 of
the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20106.
(d) "Moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited
under this act or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to
this act that occurs while a person an individual is operating a
motor vehicle, and for which the person individual is subject to a
fine.
(e) "Serious injury" means that term as defined in section
602a.
(f) "Service animal" means that term as defined in section 50a
of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50a.
Sec. 653a. (1) Upon approaching and passing a stationary
authorized emergency vehicle that is giving a visual signal by
means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating red, blue, white, or
amber, or green lights as permitted by section 698, or by means of
front and rear warning lamps as permitted by section 698a, the
driver of an approaching vehicle shall exhibit due care and
caution, as required under the following:
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(a) On any public roadway with at least 2 adjacent lanes
proceeding in the same direction of the stationary authorized
emergency vehicle, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall
proceed with caution, reduce his or her the vehicle's speed by at
least 10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit, and yield the
right-of-way by moving into a lane at least 1 moving lane or 2
vehicle widths apart from the stationary authorized emergency
vehicle, unless directed otherwise by a police officer. If movement
to an adjacent lane or 2 vehicle widths apart is not possible due
to weather, road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular
or pedestrian traffic in parallel moving lanes, the driver of the
approaching vehicle shall proceed as required in subdivision (b).
(b) On any public roadway that does not have at least 2
adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction as the stationary
authorized emergency vehicle, or if the movement by the driver of
the vehicle into an adjacent lane or 2 vehicle widths apart is not
possible as described in subdivision (a), the approaching vehicle
driver shall proceed with due care and caution and reduce his or
her the vehicle's speed by at least 10 miles per hour below the
posted speed limit, or as directed by a police officer.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (3)
and (4), a person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00 or
imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. Beginning 60 days
after the effective date of the amendatory act that amended this
subsection, except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), a person
an individual who violates this section is responsible for a civil
infraction and shall must be ordered to pay a civil fine of
$400.00.as follows:
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(a) For an individual who violates this section except as
described in subdivision (b), $400.00.
(b) For an individual who violates this section and the
stationary vehicle is an authorized emergency vehicle with a police
officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel
present, $750.00.
(3) A person An individual who violates this section and
causes injury to a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency
response personnel in the immediate area of the a stationary
authorized emergency vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by a
fine of not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 2
years, or both.
(4) A person An individual who violates this section and
causes death to a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency
response personnel in the immediate area of the a stationary
authorized emergency vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by a
fine of not more than $7,500.00 or by imprisonment for not more
than 15 years, or both.
(5) The operator driver of a vehicle upon on a highway that
has been divided into 2 roadways by leaving an intervening space,
or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing sections so
constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, is not required to
proceed with caution, reduce his or her the vehicle's speed, or
yield the right-of-way for an authorized emergency a stationary
vehicle that is stopped across the dividing space, barrier, or
section.
(6) This section does not prohibit an individual from being
charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of
law.
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


Sec. 907. (1) A violation of this act, or a local ordinance
that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, that is
designated a civil infraction must not be considered a lesser
included offense of a criminal offense.
(2) Permission may be granted for payment of a civil fine and
costs to be made within a specified period of time or in specified
installments but, unless permission is included in the order or
judgment, the civil fine and costs must be payable immediately.
Except as otherwise provided, a person found responsible or
responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction must pay
costs as provided in subsection (4) and 1 or more of the following
civil fines, as applicable:
(a) Except as otherwise provided, for a civil infraction under
this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a
provision of this act, the person must be ordered to pay a civil
fine of not more than $100.00.
(b) If the civil infraction was a moving violation that
resulted in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an
individual, or any other object, the civil fine ordered under this
section is increased by $25.00 but the total civil fine must not be
more than $100.00.
(c) For a violation of section 240, the civil fine ordered
under this section is $15.00.
(d) For a violation of section 312a(4)(a), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be more than $250.00.
(e) For a first violation of section 319f(1), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $2,500.00 or more
than $2,750.00; for a second or subsequent violation, the civil
fine must not be less than $5,000.00 or more than $5,500.00.
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


(f) For a violation of section 319g(1)(a), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be more than $10,000.00.
(g) For a violation of section 319g(1)(g), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $2,750.00 or more
than $25,000.00.
(h) For a violation of section 602b, the civil fine ordered
under this section must be as follows:
(i) For a violation of section 602b(1), either of the
following:
(A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $100.00 for
a first offense and $250.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(B) If the violation involves an accident, $200.00 for a first
offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(ii) For a violation of section 602b(2), either of the
following:
(A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $200.00 for
a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(B) If the violation involves an accident, $400.00 for a first
offense and $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(i) For a violation of section 627c, the civil fine ordered
under this section must not be more than $150.00 for a second
violation as described in section 627c(2)(b) and $300.00 for a
third or subsequent violation described in section 627c(2)(c).
(j) For a violation of section 653a(2), the civil fine ordered
under this section must be either of the following:
(i) For a violation described in section 653a(2)(a), $400.00.
(ii) For a violation described in section 653a(2)(b), $750.00.
(k) (j) For a violation of section 674(1)(s) or a local
ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 674(1)(s), the
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00
or more than $250.00.
(l) (k) For a violation of section 676a(3), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00.
(m) (l) For a violation of section 676c, the civil fine ordered
under this section is $1,000.00.
(n) (m) For a violation of section 682 or a local ordinance
that substantially corresponds to section 682, the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more
than $500.00.
(o) (n) For a violation of section 710d, the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00, subject to
subsection (11).
(p) (o) For a violation of section 710e, the civil fine and
court costs ordered under this subsection must be $25.00.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an
individual is determined to be responsible or responsible "with
explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local
ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act
while driving a commercial motor vehicle, the individual must be
ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine
of not more than $250.00.
(4) If a civil fine is ordered under subsection (2) or (3),
the judge or district court magistrate shall summarily tax and
determine the costs of the action, which are not limited to the
costs taxable in ordinary civil actions, and may include all
expenses, direct and indirect, to which the plaintiff has been put
in connection with the civil infraction, up to the entry of
judgment. Costs must not be ordered in excess of $100.00. A civil
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


fine ordered under subsection (2) or (3) must not be waived unless
costs ordered under this subsection are waived. Except as otherwise
provided by law, costs are payable to the general fund of the
plaintiff.
(5) In addition to a civil fine and costs ordered under
subsection (2) or (3) and subsection (4) and the justice system
assessment ordered under subsection (12), the judge or district
court magistrate may order the individual to attend and complete a
program of treatment, education, or rehabilitation.
(6) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions
permitted under subsections (2), (3), and (5) only to the extent
expressly authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the
district court district.
(7) Each district of the district court and each municipal
court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and
assessments to be imposed for civil infractions that occur within
the respective district or city. If a schedule is established, it
must be prominently posted and readily available for public
inspection. A schedule need not include all violations that are
designated by law or ordinance as civil infractions. A schedule may
exclude cases on the basis of a defendant's prior record of civil
infractions or traffic offenses, or a combination of civil
infractions and traffic offenses.
(8) The state court administrator shall annually publish and
distribute to each district and court a recommended range of civil
fines and costs for first-time civil infractions. This
recommendation is not binding on the courts that have jurisdiction
over civil infractions but is intended to act as a normative guide
for judges and district court magistrates and a basis for public
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


evaluation of disparities in the imposition of civil fines and
costs throughout this state.
(9) If a person has received a civil infraction citation for
defective safety equipment on a vehicle under section 683, the
court shall waive a civil fine, costs, and assessments on receipt
of certification by a law enforcement agency that repair of the
defective equipment was made before the appearance date on the
citation.
(10) A default in the payment of a civil fine or costs ordered
under subsection (2), (3), or (4) or a justice system assessment
ordered under subsection (12), or an installment of the fine,
costs, or assessment, may be collected by a means authorized for
the enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40 of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4001 to 600.4065, or
under chapter 60 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA
236, MCL 600.6001 to 600.6098.
(11) Before the effective date of 2024 PA 22, the court may
waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who
received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section
710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation,
supplies the court with evidence of acquisition, purchase, or
rental of a child seating system meeting the requirements of
section 710d. Beginning on the effective date of 2024 PA 22, the
The court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an
individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation
of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on
the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition of a
child seating system that meets the requirements of section 710d
and evidence that the individual has received education from a
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


certified child passenger safety technician.
(12) In addition to any civil fines or costs ordered to be
paid under this section, the judge or district court magistrate
shall order the defendant to pay a justice system assessment of
$40.00 for each civil infraction determination, except for a
parking violation or a violation for which the total fine and costs
imposed are $10.00 or less. On payment of the assessment, the clerk
of the court shall transmit the assessment collected to the state
treasury to be deposited into the justice system fund created in
section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL
600.181. An assessment levied under this subsection is not a civil
fine for purposes of section 909.
(13) If a person has received a citation for a violation of
section 223, the court shall waive any civil fine, costs, and
assessment on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency
that the person, before the appearance date on the citation,
produced a valid registration certificate that was valid on the
date the violation of section 223 occurred.
(14) If a person has received a citation for a violation of
section 328(1) for failing to produce a certificate of insurance
under section 328(2), the court may waive the fee described in
section 328(3)(c) and shall waive any fine, costs, and any other
fee or assessment otherwise authorized under this act on receipt of
verification by the court that the person, before the appearance
date on the citation, produced valid proof of insurance that was in
effect when the violation of section 328(1) occurred. Insurance
obtained after the violation occurred does not make the person
eligible for a waiver under this subsection.
(15) If a person is determined to be responsible or
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93


responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this
act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a
provision of this act and the civil infraction arises out of the
ownership or operation of a commercial quadricycle, the person must
be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil
fine of not more than $500.00.
(16) As used in this section, "moving violation" means an act
or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance that
substantially corresponds to this act that involves the operation
of a motor vehicle and for which a fine may be assessed.
Enacting section 1. Section 653b of the Michigan vehicle code,
1949 PA 300, MCL 257.653b, is repealed.
Enacting section 2. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Enacting section 3. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 217 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
JJR H00682'25 (H-2) eifs93